Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 11
CHALLENGE OF VOTERS

31-10-1101. No voting unless registered.

Unless otherwise permitted pursuant to section 31-10-203, no person shall be permitted to vote at any regular or special election unless his or her name is found on the registration list or official registration book or unless registration in that precinct is confirmed as provided by section 31-10-606 (1).

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1064, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1181, § 27, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1506, § 29, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 68, § 25, effective February 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-901 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

31-10-1102. Right to vote may be challenged.

When any person whose name appears on the registration list or in the registration book makes application for a ballot, his right to vote at that poll and election may be challenged. If the person so applying is not entitled to vote, no ballot shall be delivered to him. Any person may also be challenged when he offers his ballot for deposit in the ballot box.

It is the duty of any judge of election to challenge any person offering to vote who he believes is not a registered elector. In addition, challenges may be made by watchers or any registered elector of the precinct who is present.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1064, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(2) amended, p. 1506, § 30, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-902 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1103. Challenge to be made by written oath.

Each challenge shall be made by written oath, signed by the challenger under penalty of perjury, setting forth the name of the person challenged and the basis for the challenge. The judges of election shall deliver all challenges and oaths to the clerk at the time the other election papers are returned. The clerk shall forthwith deliver all challenges and oaths to the district attorney for investigation and appropriate action.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1064, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-903 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For penalty for perjury under this article, see § 31-10-1506.

31-10-1104. Challenge questions asked voter.

If a person offering to vote is challenged as unqualified, one of the judges shall tender to him the following written oath or affirmation: "You do solemnly swear or affirm that you will fully and truly answer all such questions as are put to you touching your place of residence and qualifications as a registered elector at this election."

If the person is challenged as unqualified on the ground that he is not a citizen and will not exhibit his papers pertaining to his naturalization, the judges, or one of them, shall put the following questions:

"Are you a citizen of the United States?"

"Are you a native or naturalized citizen?"

Repealed.

Repealed.

If the person is challenged as unqualified on the ground that he or she has not resided in this state for twenty-two days immediately preceding the election, the judges, or one of them, shall put the following questions:

"Have you resided in this state for twenty-two days immediately preceding this election?"

"Have you been absent from this state within the twenty-two days immediately preceding this election, and during that time have you maintained a home or domicile elsewhere?"

"If so, when you left, was it for a temporary purpose with the design of returning, or did you intend to remain away?"

"Did you, while absent, look upon and regard this state as your home?"

"Did you, while absent, vote in any state or territory?"

If the person is challenged on the ground that he or she has not resided in the municipality, one of the judges shall question the person as to his or her residence in a manner similar to the method of questioning a person as to his or her residence in this state.

If the person is challenged as unqualified on the ground that he is not eighteen years of age, the judges, or one of them, shall ask the following question: "Are you eighteen years of age or over to the best of your knowledge and belief?"

If the person challenged answers satisfactorily all of the questions put to him, he shall sign his name on the form of the challenge after the printed questions. The judges of election shall indicate in the proper place on the form of challenge whether the challenge was withdrawn and whether the challenged voter refused to answer the questions and left the polling place without voting.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1064, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(2)(c), (2)(d), and (3) repealed, p. 1640, § 50, effective July 19.

L. 92:

(4) and (5) amended, p. 2179, § 42, effective June 2.

L. 94:

IP(4), (4)(a), (4)(b), and (5) amended, p. 1774, § 42, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2014:

(4) and (5) amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 68, § 26, effective February 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-904 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

31-10-1105. Oath of challenged voter.

If the challenge is not withdrawn after the person offering to vote has answered the questions put to him or her, one of the judges shall tender the following oath:

After the person has taken the oath or affirmation, his ballot shall be received and the word "sworn" shall be written on the pollbook after the person's name.

"You do solemnly swear or affirm that you are a citizen of the United States of the age of eighteen years or over; that you have been a resident of this state for twenty-two days next preceding this election and have not retained a home or domicile elsewhere; that you are a resident of this municipality; that you are a registered elector of this precinct; and that you have not voted at this election."

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1065, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1) amended, p. 2179, § 43, effective June 2.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1775, § 43, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2014:

(1) amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 69, § 27, effective February 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-905 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

31-10-1106. Refusal to answer questions or take oath.

If the challenged person refuses to answer fully any question which is put to him as provided in section 31-10-1104 or refuses to take the oath or affirmation tendered as provided in section 31-10-1105, the judges shall reject his vote.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1065, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-906 as it existed prior to 1975.